Washington statutes.
RCW 24.12.040

Existing corporations sole.

Any corporation sole heretofore organized and existing under the laws of this state may elect to continue its existence under *this title [chapter] by filing a certificate to that effect, under its corporate seal and the hand of its incumbent, or by filing amended articles of incorporation, in the form, as near as may be, as provided for corporations aggregate, and from and after the filing of such certificate of amended articles, such corporation shall be entitled to the privileges and subject to the duties, liabilities and provisions in *this title [chapter] expressed.

[ 1915 c 79 s 4; RRS s 3887.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The language "this title" appeared in chapter 79, Laws of 1915, an independent act, codified herein as chapter 24.12 RCW.